Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1300.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 304.3. Exception from tax for early withdrawals from certain accounts.--(a) The General Assembly finds and declares that the Commonwealth shall exclude certain retirement account withdrawals from personal income tax to mirror the Federal Government's removal of taxation on the certain withdrawals.(b) In accordance with the current tax exemption by the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Federal Government, the following shall be exempt from taxation as personal income in this Commonwealth, to the limits under subsection (c):(1) Expenses related to the birth or adoption of a child.(2) The purchase of a house by a first time homebuyer.(c) The following amounts shall be excluded from tax:(1) Each parent may withdraw up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) individually for each child born or adopted.(2) The parents may withdraw up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) together for each child born or adopted.(3) Each first time home buyer may withdraw up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).Section 2. This act shall apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1300PN1637 - 2 - 123456789101112131415